Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-410. Investment.

The board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall have the power to draw sums from its treasury, only upon warrants signed by the chair of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund and countersigned by the policemen's pension and relief fund, to invest in the name of the board in interest-bearing bonds of the United States, of the State of Arkansas, or of the city in which the board is located, in a local government joint investment trust pursuant to the Local Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 19-8-301 et seq., in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, or in savings and loan associations duly established and authorized to do business in this state.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all securities shall be deposited with the treasurer of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund and shall be subject to the order of the board.

In those policemen's pension and relief funds in which assets exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board may employ:

An investment advisor as defined in § 24-10-402(a)(2)(A)(ii) to invest the assets, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, as provided by § 24-10-401 et seq.; and

A trustee or custodian to hold the assets.

Investments shall not be limited to interest-bearing bonds.

The total amount of fees paid for investment advisors, investment advisory services, investment educational services, trustee services, custodial and administrative services, and investment management services when the managers are required to perform security trades on a best execution basis shall be:

Limited to no more than three percent (3%) annually of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of plan assets, plus no more than two percent (2%) annually of the next five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of plan assets, plus no more than one percent (1%) annually of plan assets over one million dollars ($1,000,000); and

Clearly stated, in total, on all monthly, quarterly, and annual statements prepared for the board.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment moneys provided for the policemen's pension and relief fund shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 9860; Acts 1957, No. 121, § 1; 1985, No. 6, § 2; 1985, No. 16, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1805; Acts 1989, No. 152, § 3; 1995, No. 615, § 2; 2005, No. 2094, § 1; 2009, No. 1201, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 794, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” in (b); inserted (c)(1)(B) and redesignated the existing text of (c)(1) accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment added (d).

24-11-411. Payments.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all moneys paid from the pension and relief fund shall be paid by the treasurer only upon warrants signed by the chair and countersigned by the secretary thereof.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no warrant shall be drawn except by order of the board, and interest accruing from the fund while on deposit or otherwise shall constitute a part of the fund.

In a policemen's pension and relief fund in which the board has employed a trustee or custodian under § 24-11-410(c) to hold the assets, the trustee or custodian may pay benefits to persons and beneficiaries entitled to benefits under the fund as directed by the board.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 9861; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1806; Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” in (a) and (b); added (c); and made related changes.

24-11-412. Report on condition of fund.

The board of trustees shall report to the council or city commission the condition of the pension fund on the first regular meeting in January of each year.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 15; Pope's Dig., § 9870; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1815.

24-11-413. Moneys added to fund — Contributions.

There shall be added to the policemen's pension and relief fund the following moneys:

All forfeitures and fines imposed upon any member of the police department by way of discipline;

All money given or donated to the fund;

All money deducted from the salary of any member of the police department on account of absence or loss of time;

All rewards paid for any purpose;

Ten percent (10%) of all fines and forfeitures, not including court costs, collected by the county or city official, agency, or department designated pursuant to § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of fines assessed in the district courts of this state for violation of ordinances or state law that pursuant to law would be deposited into the city general fund and are not designated by law as payable to the county or state agencies or entities; and

Six percent (6%) of the monthly salary of each member of the department, to be deducted each month by the city and immediately paid to the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund.

However, the monthly deduction shall be four percent (4%) for police officers contributing to Social Security unless increased, but not to exceed six percent (6%), by the majority vote of the contributing members of a police department covered by Social Security.

All cities and towns in which a policemen’s pension and relief fund is established shall contribute to the fund an amount not less than six percent (6%) of the police officers’ salary.

The contributions by cities and towns shall not exceed the amount contributed by the police officers, except where authorized by appropriation of the city’s or town’s governing body.

A policemen's pension and relief fund that has assigned administrative responsibility for the fund to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System under § 24-11-406 continues to be eligible to collect and deposit the amounts under subsection (a) of this section as contributions.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 9857; Acts 1939, No. 11, §§ 1, 2; 1953, No. 86, § 1; 1957, No. 415, § 1; 1963, No. 211, § 1; 1969, No. 68, § 1; 1981, No. 486, § 2; 1983, No. 46, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802; Acts 1989, No. 187, § 1; 1993, No. 1289, § 1; 2001, No. 1809, § 9; 2005, No. 1934, § 16; 2009, No. 259, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1289, § 2, provided:

“Costs previously collected and deposited into police pension funds are hereby declared to have been lawfully collected and deposited into those funds and they shall not be withdrawn except for paying benefits from the fund.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (d).

24-11-414. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning certain cities not required to add fines and forfeitures to fund, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 690, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 206, § 2; 1973, No. 26, § 1; 1975, No. 32, § 1; 1977, No. 41, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802.1.

24-11-415. Proceeds derived from sale of confiscated goods.

In all cities and towns, all goods confiscated by a police officer of the city, by the sheriff, or by an officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police within the city and that are no longer needed as evidence shall be sold at auction or Internet auction.

The auction or Internet auction shall be held at least annually or more often if the city determines appropriate.

The proceeds derived from the sale of all confiscated goods shall be deposited into the city's policemen's pension and relief fund.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not supersede any existing provisions of law governing the disposition of confiscated goods.

Until such time as the policemen's pension and relief fund is actuarially sound as determined by the actuary under contract with the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, in all cities and towns all moneys confiscated by a police officer of the city, by the sheriff, or by an officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police within the city shall be deposited into the city's policemen's pension and relief fund.

Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not supersede any existing provisions of law governing the disposition of confiscated moneys.

At the time that the policemen's pension and relief fund is actuarially sound, all moneys received under this subsection shall be retained by the city.

A policemen's pension and relief fund that has assigned administrative responsibility for the fund to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System under § 24-11-406 continues to be eligible to collect and deposit these amounts as contributions until the unfunded liability as a result of the consolidation has been fully amortized.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 745, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802.2; Acts 2001, No. 1832, § 1; 2003, No. 1349, § 1; 2009, No. 31, § 1; 2009, No. 259, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 31 redesignated (a)(1), inserted “or Internet auction” in (a)(1)(A) and (B), substituted “relief” for “retirement” in (a)(1)(C), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 259 added (c).

24-11-416. Proration where fund insufficient.

If at any time there should not be sufficient money in the fund to pay each person a full amount to which he or she may be entitled, the beneficiaries shall be paid by prorating the fund available among them.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 9866; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1811.

24-11-417. Subjection of fund to legal process.

No portion of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall at any time be subject to seizure or levy under any process whatsoever for the payment of any claim or debt held against any disabled member or the surviving spouse, dependent parent, or child of a deceased or retired member.

The fund shall be securely held and distributed for the purpose of pensioning the persons mentioned in this subchapter and for no other person or purpose whatsoever.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 16; Pope's Dig., § 9871; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1816.

24-11-418. Former military service credit purchase.

Any active member of a policemen's pension and relief fund may purchase credited service in the pension fund equivalent to a period not to exceed five (5) years for service rendered by the member while on active duty in the United States Armed Forces before the member's employment covered by the pension fund, if the member:

Received an honorable discharge from the armed forces;

Has at least twenty (20) years of actual service in the pension fund; and

Contributes to the pension fund an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of the value of the credited service to be purchased.

The actuarial equivalent is of the time of the purchase of the credited service and shall be determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board or for a pension fund under administration of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the actuary for that system.

The board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall make the final determination as to the:

Length of purchased service credit;

Amount of regular interest to be charged; and

Manner in which payment is made to the pension fund.

Service credit purchased under this section shall be used to determine the member's total credited service under the pension fund but shall not be used to determine his or her final average pay under the pension fund.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 514, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1828; Acts 1987, No. 811, § 1; 1991, No. 371, § 1; Acts 2009, No. 256, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(2) and redesignated the following subdivision accordingly, and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

24-11-419. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credited service and purchase of military service by active police in cities of 75,000, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 41, § 13, effective Feb. 6, 2013. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 712, §§ 1-3; 1981, No. 429, § 1; 1983, No. 653, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1825 — 19-1827.

24-11-420. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credit for service as firefighter in cities between 24,000 and 32,500, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 920, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 381, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1809.1.

24-11-421. Credited service — Restoration.

In the event a former member again becomes an employee of the same police department where previously employed, the police officer shall again become a member of the system, and the credited service forfeited by him or her shall be restored to his or her credit, but only if he or she returns to the fund the amount refunded to him or her plus interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

The interest rate to be paid shall be equal to the fund's average investment rate of return as indicated in the last three (3) annual accountant's reports, but in no case less than six percent (6%).

The repayment shall be made according to such rules as the board shall adopt.

Any police officer who has become a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall remain a member of that system.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 46, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2900.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3).

24-11-422. Benefits — Voluntary retirement.

Any member of a police department who has performed faithful service for a period of at least twenty (20) years shall be eligible for voluntary retirement.

Upon written application by the member, the member shall be entitled to receive from the fund a monthly pension equal to one-half (½) the actual salary based upon his or her highest salary year during his or her time of service.

The term “salary” means regular salary only and does not include, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii) of this section, overtime pay, payments for unused accrued sick or annual leave, or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remuneration.

The term “salary” may include the payments to a police officer for unused accrued sick leave not to exceed ninety (90) work days recorded on the records of the city or town as of the officer's date of retirement, provided the municipality agrees by ordinance to make adequate contributions to the fund to cover the additional costs for the benefits from the increased salary and the fund is judged by an actuarial determination to be actuarially sound.

The board of trustees of the local fund shall determine the actuarial costs of the payments for the unused accrued sick leave to the fund.

The overtime exclusion shall not apply to a benefit computed at any time on a salary year prior to June 28, 1985.

Any police officer who has more than twenty (20) years of service at the time of retirement shall be entitled to receive the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00) per month in addition to his or her regular retirement pay for each full year worked over and above twenty (20) years.

In no instance shall he or she receive more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month in addition to his or her regular benefit.

The increase in benefit levels provided in this subsection for service beyond twenty (20) years shall apply only to those police officers who retire on or after January 1, 1987.

If a deceased officer receives the benefit provided under this subsection at the time of his or her death, the benefit shall be included in the amount paid to a surviving spouse or surviving child under § 24-11-425(a)(1)(A)(ii).

Any member of a department of a city which is divided by a street state line from an incorporated city or town in an adjoining state who is eligible for voluntary retirement and who shall continue to work for the department may receive the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00) per month upon retirement in addition to his or her regular monthly retirement pay for each continuous year that he or she shall work over and above his or her twenty (20) years.

In no instance shall he or she receive more than three hundred dollars ($300) per month in addition to his or her regular retirement pay.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 9864; Acts 1945, No. 176, § 3; 1957, No. 415, § 2; 1963, No. 210, § 1; 1969, No. 288, § 1; 1971, No. 63, § 1; 1981, No. 987, § 1; 1985, No. 899, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1809; Acts 1987, No. 325, § 3; 1987, No. 396, § 2; 1987, No. 797, § 2; 1989, No. 592, § 1; 1993, No. 546, § 1; 2011, No. 556, § 3; 2013, No. 41, § 14; 2015, No. 1165, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment substituted “roll and be entitled to receive from the fund a monthly pension equal to” for “roll at” in (a)(1)(B); in (a)(2)(A)(i), substituted
“means” for “as used herein shall mean” and “does not” for “shall not”; and inserted “of the local fund” in (a)(2)(A)(ii)

(b)

The 2015 amendment substituted “the member shall” for “the board of trustees shall place him or her on the pension roll and he or she shall” in (a)(1)(B).

24-11-423. Benefits — Disability retirement.

If any member of a police department becomes physically or mentally permanently disabled and this fact is certified by a physician named by the local board of trustees, he or she shall be entitled to retire and receive a pension as provided herein. A member of the police department shall not be retired for disability for natural causes unless he or she has served at least five (5) years.

If the disabling injury or disease occurred while not actually performing work in gainful employment for the police department, the monthly benefit shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants.

If, however, a police officer is injured in the line of duty, the monthly disability benefit shall either be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to the rank held by the member of the police department or shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants, whichever is greater.

For purposes of this section, “injured in the line of duty” means to have sustained a disabling injury or disease that occurs while the member of the police department is conducting official police department operations or training to become a police officer.

The local board of trustees shall determine whether the disability occurred in the line of duty and may require any medical evidence, official reports, expert testimony, or other information to be supplied by the applicant in addition to the required physician's examination. The additional benefits provided in this subdivision (a)(1)(C) shall be effective for all qualifying applications first received by the local board of trustees on or after January 1, 1987.

For purposes of computing all benefits under this section, the term “salary” means regular salary only and shall not include overtime pay, payments for unused accrued sick leave or annual leave, or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remuneration.

A police officer retired for reasons of disability who has more than twenty (20) years of service shall also be entitled to receive any supplementary benefit for which he or she would otherwise be qualified under this section and § 24-11-422.

If a member of the police department is retired because of any disability and, if he or she shall have recovered from the disability, and this fact is certified by a physician, it shall be the duty of the local board of trustees to stop the payment of the pension and to place the member back in service in the police department.

The time of the member's retirement shall be considered as continuous service in the police department.

In addition to the examination under subsection (c) of this section, the local board of trustees may require the member of the police department to have an examination by a physician named by the local board of trustees no more often than one (1) time every six (6) months, and, if the physician determines that the member of the police department has recovered from the disability, it shall be the duty of the local board of trustees to stop the payment of the pension and to place the member back in service in the police department.

The time of the member's retirement shall be considered as continuous service in the police department.

The local board of trustees shall pay for the cost of the additional physician's examination.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, §§ 7, 9, 10; Pope's Dig., §§ 9862, 9864, 9865; Acts 1941, No. 82, §§ 1, 2; 1945, No. 176, §§ 2, 3; 1957, No. 415, § 2; 1963, No. 210, § 1; 1969, No. 288, § 1; 1971, No. 63, § 1; 1981, No. 987, § 1; 1983, No. 552, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1807, 19-1809, 19-1810; Acts 1987, No. 325, §§ 2, 3; 2013, No. 41, § 15.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(C)(ii); substituted “local board of trustees” for “board” twice in (a)(1)(C)(iii); substituted “A police officer” for “Any police officer” in (b); rewrote (c)(1); in (c)(2), substituted “the member's” for “his or her” and inserted “police” preceding “department”; deleted (c)(1)(3); and rewrote (d)(1), (d)(2), and (d)(3).

24-11-424. Benefits — Retirant receiving less than one-half salary.

Retired police officers who are eligible to receive benefits from a policemen's pension and relief fund shall receive from the policemen's pension and relief fund a minimum monthly benefit of no less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 462, § 1; 1985, No. 391, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1829; Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 6, provided:

“The increased benefits provided for under the provisions of this act shall only be paid provided the retirement funds are actuarially sound after the increase as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.”

24-11-425. Benefits — Death of active or retired member.

If any active police officer or any retired member dies from any cause, leaving a surviving spouse, then the board of trustees shall direct a monthly pension during the surviving spouse's life in an amount equal to the lesser of the:

Pension attached to the rank of the deceased police officer at the time of his or her death; or

Monthly pension amount being paid to the deceased police officer at the time of his or her death.

In no event shall the benefit of the surviving spouse be less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per month.

If any active police officer or any retired member dies from any cause and leaves no surviving spouse but has a surviving child or children under the age of eighteen (18) who have not completed high school, then the board shall direct a monthly pension benefit to the surviving child or children under the age of eighteen (18) in an aggregate amount to the children equal to the pension attached to the rank of the deceased police officer at the time of his or her death, but in no event shall the benefits to the surviving children be less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per month. However, if any child enrolls in an institution of higher learning after completing high school, then the payment shall continue as long as the child is a full-time student but not beyond the child's twenty-third birthday unless he or she is a dependent child who is physically or mentally permanently disabled.

The board may continue a benefit for life for a dependent child who is physically or mentally permanently disabled and this fact is certified to the board by a physician.

The board may first require that a second evaluation be performed by another physician to be named by the board, and they shall review the child's disabled status from time to time, but at least every five (5) years.

Beginning July 1, 2007, if a retired member dies from any cause and leaves a surviving former spouse who was receiving a portion of the retired member's retirement benefit and also leaves a surviving spouse entitled to benefits under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, then until the surviving former spouse or surviving spouse dies or remarries, the surviving former spouse shall continue to receive the same benefit he or she was receiving when the retired member died.

Upon the death or remarriage of the surviving former spouse, the monthly pension of the surviving spouse shall be increased to the pension attached to the rank of the deceased police officer at the time of his or her death.

A surviving former spouse shall not be entitled to any benefit increases approved by the board for its members.

If the police officer leaves no surviving spouse or children but does leave a dependent parent, the board shall pay the dependent parent the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) monthly as long as the dependent parent remains unmarried.

The minimum benefit provided in this section shall be paid to all qualified survivors regardless of whether they were already receiving benefits or become eligible for the first time after June 17, 1981.

If any police officer marries after retirement, that surviving spouse may be entitled to a pension under this subchapter if he or she has been married to the police officer for a period of at least five (5) years, if the board of trustees for the fund decides to extend this benefit for its members and if the pension fund will be actuarially sound as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board after this benefit increase is extended to members.

If any police officer who retired after June 12, 1964, and before June 20, 1964, marries after retirement, that surviving spouse shall be entitled to a pension under this subchapter if he or she has been married to the police officer for a period of at least two (2) years and if the actuarial soundness of the fund will not be adversely affected.

In addition to the monthly pension provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the board shall order and direct the payment of the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month to each child under eighteen (18) years of age. However, the payment shall continue to each child over eighteen (18) years of age as long as the child is a full-time student but not beyond the child's twenty-third birthday unless he or she is a dependent child who is physically or mentally permanently disabled.

The board may continue a benefit for life for a dependent child who is physically or mentally permanently disabled and this fact is certified to the board by a physician on the board. The board may first require that a second evaluation be performed by another physician to be named by the board, and it shall review the child's disabled status from time to time, but at least every five (5) years.

The sum total of the pension to be paid the surviving spouse or the qualifying child of the deceased police officer shall not exceed one-half (½) of the salary attached to the rank the police officer held at the time of his or her death or the monthly pension amount being paid to the deceased police officer at the time of his or death, whichever is greater.

However, the limit on the sum total amount under subdivision (f)(1) of this section may be exceeded through benefit increases authorized under § 24-11-102.

If any surviving spouse, surviving former spouse, or child shall marry, he or she shall thereafter receive no further pension under this subchapter except that if he or she is a surviving spouse of a police officer who is killed while in the official performance of his or her duties, then any such surviving spouse's or former spouse's benefits shall continue.

Benefits may be restored to a surviving spouse whose benefits had been terminated prior to or after August 1, 1997, upon his or her application to and approval by the board.

When entitled to a pension as provided by this subchapter, a surviving spouse, child, or dependent parent shall make application to the board through the secretary of the board on a form to be provided by the board.

Accompanying the application shall be proof of the marriage of the decedent to the surviving spouse claimant.

Proof of the birth of children shall be shown by the baptismal or board of health certificates.

All applications and proof shall be retained in the custody of the board, and due notice of that action shall be registered by the secretary in his or her office.

Every member of the department must file with the secretary the names of those persons to whom death benefits are to be paid and the relationship of the beneficiary to the decedent.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, §§ 8, 13, 19; Pope's Dig., §§ 9863, 9868, 9874; Acts 1953, No. 86, § 2; 1965, No. 413, § 1; 1967, No. 127, § 1; 1981, No. 582, § 1; 1983, No. 44, § 1; 1985, No. 1027, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1808, 19-1813, 19-1819; Acts 1987, No. 618, § 1; 1993, No. 1197, § 2; 1997, No. 1138, § 1; 1997, No. 1241, § 1; 1999, No. 978, § 1; 1999, No. 1458, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 674, § 1; 2007, No. 611, §§ 2, 3; 2009, No. 32, § 1; 2011, No. 556, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 6, provided:

“The increased benefits provided for under the provisions of this act shall only be paid provided the retirement funds are actuarially sound after the increase as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1458, § 2 provided:

“The provisions of this act shall apply retroactively to allow certain surviving spouses who lost benefits because of re-marriage to have those benefits restored if their member spouses were killed while in performance of his or her official duties before Act 1241 of 1997 became effective.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Beginning July 1, 2007” in (a)(4)(A)(i), and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment, in (e)(1), deleted “who has not completed high school” following the first occurrence of “(18) years of age,” and “if the child enrolls in an institution of higher learning after completing high school, then” following “However,” and inserted “to each child over eighteen (18) years of age”; and added “or the monthly pension amount being paid to the deceased police officer at the time of his or death, whichever is greater” at the end of (f)(1).

24-11-426. Optional vesting rights policy.

Upon an actuarial determination that the policemen's pension and relief fund will remain actuarially sound, the board of trustees of a local policemen's pension and relief fund of cities of the first class shall have the option to establish a vesting rights policy in its policemen's pension and relief fund.

The required actuarial valuation shall be made by the actuary employed by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, who shall then report the actuarial findings in writing to the board of trustees.

All costs for the actuarial valuation shall be borne by the local funds.

If approved, the vesting policy shall provide that in the event a member with ten (10) years or more of credited service in the system ceases to be employed as a member of the department and does not withdraw his or her accumulated employee contributions to the system, the member shall be entitled to receive a pension upon reaching fifty-five (55) years of age and making application to the board of trustees.

The pensions shall be computed at two and one-half percent (2.5%) of salary at the time of separation from the department, multiplied by the number of years of credited service, not to exceed twenty (20) years.

Any member may elect to withdraw his or her accumulated contributions to the system at the time of separation from the department and to waive any pension rights the member may have earned in the system.

This section shall not affect any other section of the policemen's pension and relief funds of cities of the first class.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 646, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1830; Acts 2013, No. 41, § 16.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “policemen's pension and relief fund” for “fund” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “valuation” for “evaluation” and deleted “Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System upon application to the Executive Director of the” preceding “Arkansas Fire”; and substituted “actuarial valuation” for “evaluations” in (a)(3).

24-11-427. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning increase in benefits, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 684, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 217, §§ 1-3; 1981, No. 284, § 1; 1983, No. 328, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1822 — 19-1824; Acts 1987, No. 279, § 1.

24-11-428. Return of salary deductions.

In the event of resignation or discharge from the police department of any member thereof, all moneys deducted from his or her salary shall be immediately returned to him or her without interest.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 9857; Acts 1939, No. 11, §§ 1, 2; 1953, No. 86, § 1; 1957, No. 415, § 1; 1963, No. 211, § 1; 1969, No. 68, § 1; 1981, No. 486, § 2; 1983, No. 46, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802.

24-11-429. Vacation pay.

The head or chief of each police department shall arrange that each employee shall be granted an annual vacation of not fewer than fifteen (15) working days with full pay.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 9857; Acts 1939, No. 11, §§ 1, 2; 1953, No. 86, § 1; 1957, No. 415, § 1; 1963, No. 211, § 1; 1969, No. 68, § 1; 1981, No. 486, § 2; 1983, No. 46, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1802.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 2, as amended, is also codified as § 14-52-106.

24-11-430. Death benefit.

When an active or retired police officer dies, the board of trustees shall pay from the fund a sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) to pay the death benefits of the decedent to:

The surviving spouse of the police officer;

The police officer's estate if there is no surviving spouse; or

A beneficiary chosen by the police officer if before death the police officer executed a beneficiary form.

The board of trustees shall provide a beneficiary form to active and retired police officers.

Each board of trustees shall adopt a policy establishing the amount to be paid for death benefits under this section, and the amount shall be awarded uniformly to all eligible persons.

The board of trustees may change the amount of death benefits payable under this section, but in that instance the amount shall be uniformly distributed likewise.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 18; Pope's Dig., § 9873; Acts 1981, No. 438, § 1; 1983, No. 10, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1818, 19-1818.1; Acts 1997, No. 1017, § 1; 2007, No. 611, § 4; 2007, No. 1571, § 1; 2013, No. 1206, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “death benefit” for “funeral expenses” in the section heading and throughout the section; in (a), substituted “When” for “Whenever” and “pay” for “appropriate” and inserted (a)(1) through (a)(3)(B).

24-11-431. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the pension for chief of police of cities of 65,000 or more, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 5, § 1, which provided that the repeal was not applicable to persons already retired under Acts 1975, No. 315. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 315, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-819.

24-11-432. Additional benefits for certain officers hired prior to January 1, 1983.

Beginning July 1, 1987, in addition to the monthly pension benefits as set forth in §§ 24-11-401 — 24-11-403, 24-11-405 — 24-11-413, 24-11-416, 24-11-417, 24-11-422, 24-11-423, 24-11-425, 24-11-428 — 24-11-430, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, for those police officers hired prior to January 1, 1983, and who continue to work beyond their twenty-fifth year, the member shall receive at age sixty (60) and thereafter a benefit on the amount equal to one and one-fourth percent (1.25%) of final salary attached to the rank which the member may have held in the department preceding the date of retirement multiplied by the number of years of service in excess of twenty-five (25) years up to a maximum total benefit of seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary, provided that the maximum seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary shall no longer apply to benefits payable on April 30, 1993, and thereafter to persons retiring henceforth and to those persons who retired on or after July 1, 1987.

This benefit shall be payable to the member only and not to surviving spouses or dependent children.

For the purposes of this section, “salary” means recurring pays which are received for a regularly scheduled work week and shall not include, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payments for unused accrued sick leave or annual leave or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remunerations.

The term “salary” may include the payments to those police officers under this section for unused accrued sick leave not to exceed ninety (90) work days recorded on the records of the city or town as of the officer's date of retirement, provided the municipality agrees by ordinance to make adequate contributions to the fund to cover the additional costs for the benefits from the increased salary and the fund is judged by an actuarial determination to be actuarially sound. The board of trustees shall determine the actuarial costs of the payments for the unused accrued sick leave to the fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 878, § 1; 1993, No. 546, § 2; 1993, No. 872, § 1; 2001, No. 1140, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 878, § 1, is also codified as § 24-11-826.